Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-212
Penalty for signing false document.

(MBCA 1.29) (a) A person
commits an offense by signing a document that the person knows is false in
any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary
of State for filing.

(b) An offense under this
section is a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 12.
January 1, 2017